Hawaii statutes.
§96-7 Notice to complainant and agency.
If the ombudsman decides not to investigate, he shall inform the complainant of
that decision and shall state his reasons.

If the ombudsman decides to investigate, he
shall notify the complainant of his decision and he shall also notify the
agency of his intention to investigate. [L 1967, c 306, §8; HRS §96-7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next